examples/apertium-tyv.tyv.lexc
LEXICON NUM-DIGIT

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>:%- CASES-ETC-NONOM ; ! SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: CASES-ETC-NONOM ; ! SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

%<num%>%<ord%>:%>% дугаар # ; 
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%>% дугаар # ; 
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%>% дугаар CASES-ETC-NONOM ; ! SUBST-NONOM ;  
%<num%>%<ord%>:%-%>%{G%}%{I%} # ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%-%>%{G%}%{I%} # ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%-%>%{G%}%{I%} CASES-ETC-NONOM ; ! SUBST-NONOM ;  ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} # ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} # ; ! Dir/LR

%<num%>%<percent%>:%% # ;
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%% # ;

%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{а%}%{з%}%- CASES-ETC-NONOM ; ! SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{а%}%{з%} CASES-ETC-NONOM ; ! SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{э%}%{с%}%- CASES-ETC-NONOM ; ! SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{э%}%{с%} CASES-ETC-NONOM ; !  SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

ч%<num%>:ч # ;

°С%<num%>:°С # ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:°С # ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:°С%{а%}%{с%}%- CASES-ETC-NONOM ; ! SUBST-NONOM ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:°С%{э%}%{с%}%- CASES-ETC-NONOM ; ! SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>:ºС # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:ºС # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:ºС%{а%}%{с%}%- CASES-ETC-NONOM ; ! SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:ºС%{э%}%{с%}%- CASES-ETC-NONOM ; ! SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>:С # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:С # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:С%{а%}%{с%}%- CASES-ETC-NONOM ; ! SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:С%{э%}%{с%}%- CASES-ETC-NONOM ; ! SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

°%<num%>:° # ; ! Dir/LR
°%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:° # ; ! Dir/LR
°%<num%>%<subst%>:°%{а%}%{с%}%- CASES-ETC-NONOM ; ! SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°%<num%>%<subst%>:°%{э%}%{с%}%- CASES-ETC-NONOM ; ! SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR


! Measurement units

км:км SQRD ;
мм:мм SQRD ;
см:см SQRD ;
м:м SQRD ;

LEXICON LASTDIGIT

1:1%{э%}%{й%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "бир"
2:2%{э%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "ийи"
3:3%{э%}%{с%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "үш"
4:4%{э%}%{с%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "дөрт"
5:5%{э%}%{с%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "беш"
6:6%{а%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "алды"
7:7%{э%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "чеди"
8:8%{э%}%{с%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "сес"
9:9%{а%}%{с%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "тос"

LEXICON LASTDIGIT-REST

1%0:1%0%{а%}%{н%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "он"
2%0:2%0%{э%}            NUM-DIGIT ; ! "чээрби"
3%0:3%0%{э%}%{н%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "үжен"
4%0:4%0%{э%}%{н%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "дөртен"
5%0:5%0%{э%}%{н%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "бежен"
6%0:6%0%{а%}%{н%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "алдан"
7%0:7%0%{э%}%{н%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "чеден"
8%0:8%0%{э%}%{н%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "сезен"
9%0:9%0%{а%}%{н%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "тозан"

LEXICON POWERS

%0%0:%0%0%{э%}%{с%}     NUM-DIGIT ; ! "чүс"
%0%0%0:%0%0%0%{а%}%{н%} NUM-DIGIT ; ! "мың"

LEXICON LOOP

%,:%, DIGITLEX ;
%.:%. DIGITLEX ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%,:%, POWERS ;
%.:%. POWERS ;
      DIGITLEX ;
      LASTDIGIT ;
      LASTDIGIT-REST ;
      POWERS ;

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ;
1:1   LOOP ;
2:2   LOOP ;
3:3   LOOP ;
4:4   LOOP ;
5:5   LOOP ;
6:6   LOOP ;
7:7   LOOP ;
8:8   LOOP ;
9:9   LOOP ;

!==============================================================================!
!          N U M E R A L     L E X I C O N     E N D S     H E R E
!==============================================================================!


LEXICON CLIT-COP

%+э%<cop%>%<aor%>: V-PERS-S1 ; 
%+э%<cop%>%<aor%>%<evid%>:%>%-%{D%}%{I%}р V-PERS-S1 ; 
%+э%<cop%>%<aor%>%<evid%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-PERS-S1 ;  ! Dir/LR
%+ыл%<qst%>:%>%{i%}л # ; ! FIXME: Check what this is

# ; 

LEXICON CLIT-IMPER 

%+ам%<pol%>:%>%{A%}м # ; 

# ;

LEXICON CASES

CASES-NOMONLY ;
CASE-NONOM ;

LEXICON CASES-NOMONLY

%<nom%>: CLIT-COP ;

LEXICON CASE-NONOM

%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}ң # ;
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} # ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} # ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н # ;
%<all%>:%>%{J%}е # ;
%<all%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}в%{A%} # ; ! Dir/LR


LEXICON CASES-ETC

CASES ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON CASES-ETC-NONOM

CASE-NONOM ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;


LEXICON POSS-REAL

%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}м CASES-ETC ; 
%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}ң CASES-ETC ; 
%<px3sp%>:%>%{z%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ; 
%<px1pl%>:%>%{i%}в%{I%}с CASES-ETC ; 
%<px2pl%>:%>%{i%}ң%{A%}р CASES-ETC ; 

LEXICON POSS-NONOM

%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}м CASES-ETC-NONOM ; 
%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}ң CASES-ETC-NONOM ; 
%<px3sp%>:%>%{z%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC-NONOM ; 
%<px1pl%>:%>%{i%}в%{I%}с CASES-ETC-NONOM ; 
%<px2pl%>:%>%{i%}ң%{A%}р CASES-ETC-NONOM ; 

LEXICON GENPOSS-ETC 

%<gen%>%<subst%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES ; 
%<gen%>%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%>%{N%}%{I%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES ; 
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} ATTR-SUBST ; 

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON

POSS-REAL ;
CASES-ETC ;

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON-NODER

POSS-REAL ;
CASES ;

LEXICON SUBST

N-INFL-COMMON ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON ATTR-SUBST

! Goes to possessive suffixes along with cases.
!
!   Мен Кызылдагыларын көрдүм. 
!
! Check this, maybe only px3sp is possible.

%<attr%>: # ;
%<subst%>: N-INFL-COMMON-NODER ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р N-INFL-COMMON-NODER ;

LEXICON N1 

!%<n%>%+лыг%<post%>:%>%{L%}%{I%}г # ;
!%<n%>%+лы%<post%>:%>%{L%}%{I%}г # ;
%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON N5

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>:%{☭%} SUBST ;

LEXICON N6

:%{и%} N1 ; 
            ! We want to analyse forms without %{и%}, since they're used
            ! but "properly" we want to generate forms with %{и%}
N1 ;        ! Dir/LR ! Use/Sub

LEXICON N7

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<n%>:%- POSS-NONOM ;
%<n%>: POSS-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR


LEXICON NP-COMMON

CASES-ETC ; 
POSS-REAL ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP-RUS

%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP-ABBR

%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>: CASES-NOMONLY ; 
%<np%>%<top%>:%- CASES-ETC-NONOM ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-SK

%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>:%{и%} NP-COMMON ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP-PX

%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>: POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NP-COMMON ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-OBIN-FEM

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:а NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<pl%>:а%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OB

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./
! Also, even the ев ones are normally pronounced
!    (and take harmony) as if they end in йыф/йып

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;                     
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{☭%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;    

!%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{а%}%{с%} NP-COMMON ;
!%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{а%}%{с%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;

LEXICON NP-COG-IN

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев, -ин
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{☭%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;

LEXICON NP-COG-SKIJ 

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:ий NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:ая NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-M

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-OGLU
! FIXME: can these also be patronymics ?

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: NP-COMMON ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: NP-COMMON ; 

LEXICON NP-PAT-M

%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>:%{и%} NP-COMMON ;


LEXICON NP-PAT-VICH

! For patronyms ending with -вич
! Their feminine equivalents end with -вна /I.S./

%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>%<attr%>:вич # ;
%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>:вич%{и%} NP-COMMON ;

%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>%<attr%>:вна # ;
%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>:вна NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>: NP-COMMON ; 

LEXICON NP-AL-PX

%<np%>%<al%>: POSS-REAL ;


LEXICON NP-AL-ABBR

%<np%>%<al%>: CASES-NOMONLY ; 
%<np%>%<al%>:%- CASES-ETC-NONOM ;

LEXICON Nouns 
допшу:допшу N1 ; ! "сосок"
өөскүдүкчү:өөскүдүкчү N1 ; ! "возбудитель"
херим:херим N1 ; ! "двор"
эмчи:эмчи N1 ; ! "врач"
ассортимент:ассортимент N6 ; ! ""
лаврент:лаврент N6 ; ! ""
элемент:элемент N6 ; ! ""
журналист:журналист N5 ; ! ""
продукт:продукт N6 ; ! ""
казах:казах N5 ; ! ""
профилактика:профилактика N1 ; ! ""
реабилитолог:реабилитолог N5 ; ! ""
массажист:массажист N5 ; ! ""
схема:схема N5 ; ! ""
талант:талант N6 ; ! ""
история:история N1 ; ! ""
электрокомплекс:электрокомплекс N6 ; ! ""
микроб:микроб N5 ; ! ""
ЕГЭ:ЕГЭ%{э%} N7 ; ! ""
КХН:КХН%{э%} N7 ; ! ""
СПИД:СПИД%{э%} N7 ; ! ""
LEXICON ProperNouns 
Галапагос:Галапагос NP-TOP ; ! ""
Петербург:Петербург NP-TOP-RUS ;  ! ""
Санкт%-Петербург:Санкт%-Петербург NP-TOP-RUS ;  ! ""
Сталинград:Сталинград NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
Ленинград:Ленинград NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
Волгоград:Волгоград NP-TOP-RUS; ! ""
Горький:Горький NP-TOP ; ! ""
Колумбия:Колумбия NP-TOP ;  ! ""
Богота:Богота NP-TOP ; ! ""
Моав:Моав NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
Толстой:Толстой NP-COG-M ; ! "" ! FIXME: check
Ататүрк:Ататүрк NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Архимед:Архимед NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Владислав:Владислав%{☭%} NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Рафик:Рафик NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Антон:Антон NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Диана:Диана NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Анита:Анита NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Пугачев:Пугачев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Козлов:Козлов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Горький:Горький NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Мельниченко:Мельниченко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Биче%-оол:Биче%-оол NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Кёрген%-оол:Кёрген%-оол NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Седеней:Седеней NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Шулуужап:Шулуужап NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Ильич:Ильич NP-PAT-M ; ! "" ! FIXME: check fem form
Никитич:Никитич NP-PAT-M ; ! ""
Май%-оолович:Май%-ооло NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Адыгбаевич:Адыгбае NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Ирикпеевич:Ирикпее NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Сандыкович:Сандыко NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Ырышович:Ырышо NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Бредников:Бредников NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Стучков:Стучков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Семёнов:Семёнов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Алёнушка:Алёнушка NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Настя:Настя NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Очанмаа:Очанмаа NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Сиириңмаа:Сиириңмаа NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Батый:Батый NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Стокгольм:Стокгольм NP-TOP ; ! ""
Путин:Путин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Ельцин:Ельцин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Ермаковск:Ермаковск NP-TOP-SK ; ! ""
Новосибирск:Новосибирск NP-TOP-SK ; ! ""
Бийск:Бийск NP-TOP-SK ; ! ""
Нефтегорск:Нефтегорск NP-TOP-SK ; ! ""
Исайя:Исайя NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Самария:Самария NP-TOP ; ! ""
Бадовский:Бадовск NP-COG-SKIJ ; ! ""
Бурдуковский:Бурдуковск NP-COG-SKIJ ; ! ""
Злочевский:Злочевск NP-COG-SKIJ ; ! ""
Лисовский:Лисовск NP-COG-SKIJ ; ! ""
Ходорковский:Ходорковск NP-COG-SKIJ ; ! ""
Ярыгин:Ярыгин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Камынин:Камынин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Квашин:Квашин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Борис%-оглу:Борис%-оглу NP-COG-OGLU ; ! ""
Зариф%-оглу:Зариф%-оглу NP-COG-OGLU ; ! ""
Кечил%-оглу:Кечил%-оглу NP-COG-OGLU ; ! ""
Мыдык%-оглу:Мыдык%-оглу NP-COG-OGLU ; ! ""
Түлүш%-оглу:Түлүш%-оглу NP-COG-OGLU ; ! ""
Буйбинск:Буйбинск NP-TOP-SK ; ! ""
Копейск:Копейск NP-TOP-SK ; ! ""
Багам% ортулуктары:Багам% ортулуктар NP-TOP-PX ; ! ""
Канар% ортулуктары:Канар% ортулуктар NP-TOP-PX ; ! ""
Каттышкан% Араб% Эмираттары:Каттышкан% Араб% Эмираттар NP-TOP-PX ; ! ""
Совет% Эвилели:Совет% Эвилел NP-TOP-PX ; ! ""
Совет% Социалистиг% Республикаларның% Эвилели:Совет% Социалистиг% Республикаларның% Эвилел NP-TOP-PX ; ! ""
Соломон% ортулуктары:Соломон% ортулуктар NP-TOP-PX ; ! ""
РФ:РФ NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
АКШ:АКШ%{ы%} NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
ССРЭ:ССРЭ%{э%} NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
СССР:СССР%{э%} NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
Тыва% АСЭР:Тыва% АСЭР%{э%} NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
Якут% АССР:Якут% АССР%{э%} NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
Тываагрохолдинг:Тываагрохолдинг NP-AL ; ! ""
Каттышкан% Нацияларның% Организациязы:Каттышкан% Нацияларның% Организация NP-AL-PX ; ! ""
Каттышкан% Нацияларның% Организациязы:Каттышкан% Нациялар% Организация NP-AL-PX ; ! "" ! Dir/LR
Казахфильм:Казахфильм NP-AL ; ! ""
Гавард:Гавард NP-AL ; ! "Harvard"
Мегафон:Мегафон NP-AL ; ! ""
Росавтоорук:Росавтоорук NP-AL ; ! ""
СЭТА:СЭТА%{а%} NP-AL-ABBR ; ! ""
ХБАБ:ХБАБ%{а%} NP-AL-ABBR ; ! ""
ЮНИСЕФ:ЮНИСЕФ NP-AL-ABBR ; ! ""
КТРК:КТРК%{а%} NP-AL-ABBR ; ! ""
ОБЯ:ОБЯ%{а%} NP-AL-ABBR ;
